Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska59-1737
Disclosure document; disclose period of time plan sold or offered.

The disclosure document required by section 59-1732 shall contain the length of time the seller of the plan has sold seller-assisted marketing plans, and the length of time the seller has sold the specific seller-assisted marketing plan being offered to the purchaser.

Laws 1979, LB 180, § 37;

Laws 1983, LB 461, § 6.